California statutes. Probate Code
(e) If a first trust contains a determinable charitable interest, the second trust or trusts that include a charitable interest pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be administered under the law of this state unless any of the following occur:

(1) The Attorney General, after receiving notice under Section 19507, fails to object in a signed writing delivered to the authorized fiduciary within the notice period.

(2) The Attorney General consents in a signed writing
 to the second trust or trusts being administered under the law of another jurisdiction.

(3) The court approves the exercise of the decanting power.

(f) This part does not limit the powers and duties of the Attorney General under law of this state other than this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19515.

(a) An authorized fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power to the extent the first trust instrument expressly prohibits exercise of either of the following:

(1) The decanting power.

(2) A power granted by state law to the fiduciary to distribute part or all of the principal of the trust to another trust or to modify the trust.

(b) Exercise of the decanting power is subject to any restriction in the first trust instrument that expressly applies to exercise of either of the following:

(1) The decanting power.

(2) A power granted by state law to a fiduciary to distribute part or all of the principal of the trust to another trust or to modify the trust.

(c) A general prohibition of the amendment or revocation of a first trust, a spendthrift clause, or a clause restraining the voluntary or involuntary transfer of a beneficiary’s interest does not preclude exercise of the decanting power.

(d) Subject to subdivisions (a) and (b), an authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power under this part even if the first trust instrument permits the authorized fiduciary or another person to modify the first trust instrument or to distribute part or all of the principal of the first trust to another trust.

(e) If a first trust instrument contains an express prohibition
 described in subdivision (a) or an express restriction described in subdivision (b), the authorized fiduciary shall include that provision or restriction in the second trust instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19516.

(a) If a first trust instrument specifies an authorized fiduciary’s compensation, the fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power to increase the fiduciary’s compensation above the specified compensation unless either of the following occurs:

(1) All qualified beneficiaries of the second trust consent to the increase in a signed writing.

(2) The increase is approved by the court.

(b) If a first trust instrument does not specify an authorized fiduciary’s compensation, the fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power to increase the fiduciary’s compensation above the compensation permitted by this code unless
 either of the following occurs:

(1) All qualified beneficiaries of the second trust consent to the increase in a signed writing.

(2) The increase is approved by the court.

(c) (1) A change in an authorized fiduciary’s compensation which is incidental to other changes made by the exercise of the decanting power is not an increase in the fiduciary’s compensation for purposes of subdivisions (a) and (b).

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, an incidental change to an authorized fiduciary’s compensation includes, but is not limited to, an increase in the compensation of the authorized fiduciary for either of the following reasons:

(A) The second trust lasts longer than
 the first trust.

(B) The second trust has a greater value than the first trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19517.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a second trust instrument may not relieve an authorized fiduciary from liability for breach of trust to a greater extent than the first trust instrument.

(b) A second trust instrument may provide for indemnification of an authorized fiduciary of the first trust or another person acting in a fiduciary capacity under the first trust for any liability or claim that would have been payable from the first trust if the decanting power had not been exercised.

(c) A second trust instrument may not reduce fiduciary liability in the aggregate.

(d) Subject to subdivision (c), a
 second trust instrument may reallocate fiduciary powers among fiduciaries as permitted by the law of this state other than this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19518.

An authorized fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power to modify a provision in a first trust instrument granting another person power to remove or replace the fiduciary unless any of the following occurs:

(a) The person holding the power consents to the modification in a signed writing and the modification applies only to the person.

(b) The person holding the power and the qualified beneficiaries of the second trust consent to the modification in a signed writing and the modification grants a substantially similar power to another person.

(c) The court approves the modification and the modification grants a substantially similar
 power to another person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19519.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Grantor trust” means a trust as to which a settlor of a first trust is considered the owner under Sections 671 to 677, inclusive, or Section 679 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Secs. 671 to 677, 679).

(2) “Nongrantor trust” means a trust that is not a grantor trust.

(3) “Qualified benefits property” means property subject to the minimum distribution requirements of Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a)(9)), and any applicable regulations, or to any similar requirements that refer to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.
 Sec. 401(a)(9)) or the regulations.

(b) An exercise of the decanting power is subject to all of the following limitations:

(1) If a first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but for provisions of this part other than this section, for a marital deduction for purposes of the gift or estate tax under the Internal Revenue Code or a state gift, estate, or inheritance tax, the second trust instrument shall not include or omit any term that, if included in or omitted from the trust instrument for the trust to which the property was transferred, would have prevented the transfer from qualifying for the deduction, or would have reduced the amount of the deduction, under the same provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or state law under which the transfer qualified.

(2) If the first trust contains
 property that qualified, or would have qualified but for provisions of this part other than this section, for a charitable deduction for purposes of the income, gift, or estate tax under the Internal Revenue Code or a state income, gift, estate, or inheritance tax, the second trust instrument shall not include or omit any term that, if included in or omitted from the trust instrument for the trust to which the property was transferred, would have prevented the transfer from qualifying for the deduction, or would have reduced the amount of the deduction, under the same provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or state law under which the transfer qualified.

(3) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but for provisions of this part other than this section, for the exclusion from the gift tax described in Section 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2503(b)), the second trust instrument shall
 not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the trust instrument for the trust to which the property was transferred, would have prevented the transfer from qualifying under Section 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2503(b)). If the first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but for provisions of this part other than this section, for the exclusion from the gift tax described in Section 2503(b) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2503(b)) by application of Section 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2503(c)), the second trust instrument shall not include or omit a term that, if included or omitted from the trust instrument for the trust to which the property was transferred, would have prevented the transfer from qualifying under Section 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2503(c)).

(4) If the property of the first trust includes shares
 of stock in an S-corporation, as defined in Section 1361 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 1361) and the first trust is, or but for provisions of this part other than this section would be, a permitted shareholder under any provision of Section 1361 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 1361), an authorized fiduciary may exercise the power with respect to part or all of the S-corporation stock only if any second trust receiving the stock is a permitted shareholder under Section 1361(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 1361(c)(2)). If the property of the first trust includes shares of stock in an S-corporation and the first trust is, or but for provisions of this part other than this section would be, a qualified subchapter-S trust within the meaning of Section 1361(d) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 1361(d)), the second trust instrument shall not include or omit a term that prevents the second trust from qualifying as a qualified subchapter-S trust.

(5) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or would have qualified but for provisions of this part other than this section, for a zero inclusion ratio for purposes of the generation-skipping transfer tax under Section 2642(c) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2642(c)), the second trust instrument shall not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the first trust instrument, would have prevented the transfer to the first trust from qualifying for a zero inclusion ratio under Section 2642(c) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2642(c)).

(6) If the first trust is directly or indirectly the beneficiary of qualified benefits property, the second trust instrument may not include or omit any term that, if included in or omitted from the first trust instrument, would have increased the minimum distributions required with respect to the
 qualified benefits property under Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a)(9)) and any applicable regulations, or any similar requirements that refer to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a)(9)) or the regulations. If an attempted exercise of the decanting power violates the preceding sentence, the trustee is deemed to have held the qualified benefits property and any reinvested distributions of the property as a separate share from the date of the exercise of the power and Section 19522 applies to the separate share.

(7) If the first trust qualifies as a grantor trust because of the application of Section 672(f)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 672(f)(2)(A)), the second trust may not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the first trust instrument, would have prevented the first trust from qualifying under Section 672(f)(2)(A) of the Internal
 Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 672(f)(2)(A)).

(8) In this paragraph, “tax benefit” means a federal or state tax deduction, exemption, exclusion, or other benefit not otherwise listed in this section, except for a benefit arising from being a grantor trust. Subject to paragraph (9), a second trust instrument may not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the first trust instrument, would have prevented qualification for a tax benefit if both of the following apply:

(A) The first trust instrument expressly indicates an intent to qualify for the benefit or the first trust instrument clearly is designed to enable the first trust to qualify for the benefit.

(B) The transfer of property held by the first trust or the first trust qualified, or, but for provisions of this part other than this section,
 would have qualified for the tax benefit.

(9) (A) Subject to paragraph (4), and except as otherwise provided in paragraph (7), the second trust may be a nongrantor trust, even if the first trust is a grantor trust.

(B) Subject to paragraph (4), and except as otherwise provided in paragraph (10), the second trust may be a grantor trust, even if the first trust is a nongrantor trust.

(10) An authorized fiduciary may not exercise the decanting power if a settlor objects in a signed writing delivered to the fiduciary within the notice period and either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(A) The first trust and a second trust are both grantor trusts, in whole or in part, the first trust grants the settlor or another person the
 power to cause the first trust to cease to be a grantor trust, and the second trust does not grant an equivalent power to the settlor or other person.

(B) The first trust is a nongrantor trust and a second trust is a grantor trust, in whole or in part, with respect to the settlor, unless either of the following apply:

(i) The settlor has the power at all times to cause the second trust to cease to be a grantor trust.

(ii) The first trust instrument contains a provision granting the settlor or another person a power that would cause the first trust to cease to be a grantor trust and the second trust instrument contains the same provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19520.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a second trust may have a duration that is the same as, or different from, the duration of the first trust.

(b) To the extent that property of a second trust is attributable to property of the first trust, the property of the second trust is subject to any rules governing maximum perpetuity, accumulation, or suspension of the power of alienation that apply to property of the first trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19521.

An authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power whether or not under the first trust’s discretionary distribution standard the fiduciary would have made or could have been compelled to make a discretionary distribution of principal at the time of the exercise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19522.

(a) If exercise of the decanting power would be effective under this part, except that the second trust instrument in part does not comply with this part, the exercise of the power is effective and the following rules apply with respect to the principal of the second trust attributable to the exercise of the power:

(1) A provision in the second trust instrument that is not permitted under this part is void to the extent necessary to comply with this part.

(2) A provision required by this part to be in the second trust instrument, which is not contained in the instrument, is deemed to be included in the instrument to the extent necessary to comply with this part.

(b) If a trustee or other fiduciary of a second trust determines that subdivision (a) applies to a prior exercise of the decanting power, the fiduciary shall take corrective action consistent with the fiduciary’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19523.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Animal trust” means a trust or an interest in a trust described in Section 15212.

(2) “Protector” means either of the following:

 (A) A person appointed in an animal trust to enforce the trust on behalf of the animal as described in subdivision (c) of Section 15212 or, if no person is appointed in the trust for that purpose, a person appointed by the court for that purpose.

(B) A nonprofit charitable corporation described in subdivision (e) of Section 15212 that has requested an accounting in writing.

(b) The decanting power may be exercised over an animal trust that has a protector to the extent the trust could be decanted under this part if each animal that benefits from the trust were an individual, if the protector consents in a signed writing to the exercise of the power.

(c) A protector for an animal has the rights under this part of a qualified beneficiary.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if a first trust is an animal trust, in an exercise of the decanting power, the second trust shall provide that trust property may be applied only to its intended purpose for the period the first trust benefited the animal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19524.

A reference in this code to a trust instrument or terms of the trust includes a second trust instrument and the terms of the second trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19525.

(a) For purposes of the law of this state other than this part and subject to subdivision (b), a settlor of a first trust is deemed to be the settlor of the second trust with respect to the portion of the principal of the first trust subject to the exercise of the decanting power.

(b) In determining settlor intent with respect to a second trust, the intent of a settlor of the first trust, a settlor of the second trust, and the authorized fiduciary may be considered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19526.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), if exercise of the decanting power was intended to distribute all the principal of the first trust to one or more second trusts, later-discovered property belonging to the first trust and property paid to or acquired by the first trust after the exercise of the power is part of the trust estate of the second trust or trusts.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), if exercise of the decanting power was intended to distribute less than all the principal of the first trust to one or more second trusts, later-discovered property belonging to the first trust or property paid to or acquired by the first trust after exercise of the power remains part of the trust estate of the first
 trust.

(c) An authorized fiduciary may provide in an exercise of the decanting power or by the terms of a second trust for disposition of later-discovered property belonging to the first trust or property paid to or acquired by the first trust after exercise of the power.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19527.

A debt, liability, or other obligation enforceable against property of a first trust is enforceable to the same extent against the property when held by the second trust after exercise of the decanting power.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19529.

This part does not limit a trustee’s ability to petition for instructions or other approval under a trust pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 5 or to petition for modification of a trust pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15400) of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 212.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

19530.

The provisions of this part are severable. If any provision of this part or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. PRORATION OF TAXES [20100. - 20225.]



CHAPTER 1. Proration of Estate Taxes [20100. - 20125.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [20100. - 20101.]

20100.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the following definitions shall govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Estate tax” means a tax imposed by any federal or California estate tax law, now existing or hereafter enacted, and includes interest and penalties on any deficiency.

(b) “Person interested in the estate” means any person, including a personal representative, entitled to receive, or who has received, from a decedent while alive or by reason of the death of the decedent any property or interest therein.

(c) “Personal representative” includes a guardian, conservator, trustee, or other person charged with the responsibility of paying the estate tax.

(d) “Property” means property included in the gross estate for federal estate tax purposes.

(e) “Value” means fair market value as determined for federal estate tax purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20101.

(a) This chapter does not apply to persons interested in the estate of a decedent who died before January 1, 1987.

(b) Notwithstanding the repeal of former Article 4a (commencing with Section 970) of Chapter 15 of Division 3 of the Probate Code by Chapter 783 of the Statutes of 1986, the provisions of that former article remain applicable where the decedent died before January 1, 1987. No inference as to the applicable law in effect before January 1, 1987, shall be drawn from the enactment of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Proration [20110. - 20117.]

20110.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any estate tax shall be equitably prorated among the persons interested in the estate in the manner prescribed in this article.

(b) This section does not apply:

(1) To the extent the decedent in a written inter vivos or testamentary instrument disposing of property specifically directs that the property be applied to the satisfaction of an estate tax or that an estate tax be prorated to the property in the manner provided in the instrument. As used in this paragraph, an “instrument disposing of property” includes an instrument that creates an interest in property or an amendment to an instrument that disposes of property or creates an interest in property.

(2) Where federal law directs otherwise. If federal law directs the manner of proration of the federal estate tax, the California estate tax shall be prorated in the same manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20111.

The proration required by this article shall be made in the proportion that the value of the property received by each person interested in the estate bears to the total value of all property received by all persons interested in the estate, subject to the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20112.

(a) In making a proration of the federal estate tax, allowances shall be made for credits allowed for state or foreign death taxes in determining the federal tax payable and for exemptions and deductions allowed for the purpose of determining the taxable estate.

(b) In making a proration of the California estate tax, allowances shall be made for (1) credits (other than the credit for state death taxes paid) allowed by the federal estate tax law and attributable to property located in this state, and (2) exemptions and deductions allowed by the federal estate tax law for the purpose of determining the taxable estate attributable to property located in this state.

(c) In making a proration of an estate tax, interest on extension of taxes and interest and penalties on any deficiency shall be charged to equitably reflect the benefits and burdens of the extension or deficiency and of any tax deductions associated with the interest and penalties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20113.

If a trust is created, or other provision made whereby a person is given an interest in the income of, an estate for years or for life in, or other temporary interest in, any property, the estate tax on both the temporary interest and on the remainder thereafter shall be charged against and paid out of the corpus of the property without apportionment between remainders and temporary estates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20114.

(a) As used in this section, “qualified real property” means qualified real property as defined in Section 2032A of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A).

(b) If an election is made pursuant to Section 2032A of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A), the proration shall be based upon the amount of federal estate tax that would be payable but for the election. The amount of the reduction in federal estate tax resulting from an election pursuant to Section 2032A of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A) shall reduce the tax that is otherwise attributable to the qualified real property that is the subject of the election. If the tax that is otherwise attributable to the qualified real property is reduced to zero pursuant to this subdivision, any excess amount of reduction shall reduce the tax otherwise payable with respect to the other property, this amount to be equitably prorated in accordance with Section 20111.

(c) If additional federal estate tax is imposed under subsection (c) of Section 2032A of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 2032A) by reason of early disposition or cessation of qualified use, the additional tax shall be a charge against the portion of the qualified real property to which the additional tax is attributable, and shall be equitably prorated among the persons interested in that portion of the qualified real property in proportion to their interests.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20114.5.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) A reference to Section 4980A of the Internal Revenue Code means Section 4980A of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as amended (26 U.S.C. Sec. 4980A) and also means former Section 4981A of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(2) “Excess retirement accumulation” has the meaning given it in paragraph (3) of subsection (d) of Section 4980A.

(b) If the federal estate tax is increased under subsection (d) of Section 4980A of the Internal Revenue Code, the amount of the increase shall be a charge against the persons who receive the excess retirement accumulation that gives rise to the increase, and shall be equitably prorated among all persons who receive interests in qualified employer plans and individual retirement plans to which the excess retirement accumulation is attributable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 281.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

20115.

Where the payment of any portion of the federal estate tax is extended under the provisions of the federal estate tax law, the amount of extended tax shall be a charge against the persons who receive the specific property that gives rise to the extension.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20116.

(a) If all property does not come into the possession of the personal representative, the personal representative is entitled, and has the duty, to recover from the persons interested in the estate the proportionate amount of the estate tax with which the persons are chargeable under this chapter.

(b) If the personal representative cannot collect from any person interested in the estate the amount of an estate tax apportioned to the person, the amount not recoverable shall be equitably prorated among the other persons interested in the estate who are subject to proration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20117.

(a) If a person is charged with or required to pay an estate tax greater than the amount prorated to that person because another person does not pay the amount of estate tax prorated to the other person, the person charged with or required to pay the greater amount has a right of reimbursement against the other person.

(b) The right of reimbursement may be enforced through the personal representative in the discretion of the personal representative, or may be enforced directly by the person charged with or required to pay the greater amount, and for the purpose of direct enforcement the person is subrogated to the position of the personal representative.

(c) The personal representative or person who has a right of reimbursement may commence a proceeding to have a court determine the right of reimbursement. The provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 20120) shall govern the proceeding, with changes necessary to make the provisions appropriate for application to the proceeding, and the court order determining the right of reimbursement is an enforceable judgment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Judicial Proceedings [20120. - 20125.]

20120.

(a) The personal representative or any person interested in the estate may commence a proceeding to have a court determine the proration pursuant to this chapter.

(b) A proceeding under this article shall be commenced in the court in which the estate of the decedent was administered or, if no administration proceedings have been commmenced, in the superior court of any county in which the estate of the decedent may be administered.

(c) If proceedings for the administration of the decedent’s estate are pending, a proceeding under this article shall be combined with the administration proceedings. If a proceeding is commenced at any time before final distribution, there shall be no additional filing fee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20121.

A proceeding under this article shall be commenced by filing a petition that sets forth all of the following information:

(a) The jurisdictional facts.

(b) Other facts necessary for the court to determine the proration of estate taxes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20122.

Not less than 30 days before the hearing, the petitioner shall do both of the following:

(a) Cause notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the personal representative and to each person interested in the estate against whom prorated amounts may be charged pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 20123.

(b) Cause a summons and a copy of the petition to be served on each person interested in the estate who may be directed to make payment of prorated amounts pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 20123. The summons shall be in
 the form and shall be served in the manner prescribed in Title 5 (commencing with Section 410.10) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 106.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20123.

(a) The court, upon making a determination as provided in this article, shall make an order:

(1) Directing the personal representative to charge the prorated amounts against the persons against whom an estate tax has been prorated insofar as the personal representative is in possession of any property or interests of the persons against whom the charge may be made.

(2) Summarily directing all other persons against whom an estate tax has been prorated to make payment of the prorated amounts to the personal representative.

(b) A court order made under this section is a judgment that may be enforced against the persons against whom an estate tax has been prorated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

20124.

Upon petition by the personal representative or any person interested in the estate, the court shall modify an order made pursuant to this article whenever it appears that the amount of estate tax as actually determined is different from the amount of estate tax on which the court based the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20125.

(a) A personal representative acting or resident in another state may commence an action in this state to recover from a person interested in the estate, who either is resident in this state or owns property in this state, the amount of the federal estate tax, or an estate tax or death duty payable to another state, apportioned to the person.

(b) The action shall be commenced in the superior court of any county in which administration of the estate of the decedent would be proper or, if none, in which any defendant resides.

(c) For purposes of the action the apportionment by the court having jurisdiction of the administration of the decedent’s estate in the other state is prima facie correct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Proration of Taxes on Generation-Skipping Transfer [20200. - 20225.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [20200. - 20201.]

20200.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the following definitions shall govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Generation-skipping transfer tax” means a tax imposed by any federal or California generation-skipping transfer tax law, now existing or hereafter enacted, and includes interest and penalties on any deficiency.

(b) “Property” means property on which a generation-skipping transfer tax is imposed.

(c) “Transferee” means any person who receives, who is deemed to receive, or who is the beneficiary of, any property.

(d) “Trustee” means any person who is a trustee within the meaning of the federal generation-skipping transfer tax law, or who is otherwise required to pay a generation-skipping transfer tax.

(e) “Value” means fair market value as determined for generation-skippi ng transfer tax purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20201.

(a) This chapter does not apply to transferees of property of a decedent who died before January 1, 1987.

(b) No inference as to the applicable law in effect before January 1, 1987, shall be drawn from the enactment of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Proration [20210. - 20215.]

20210.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any generation-skipping transfer tax shall be equitably prorated among the transferees in the manner prescribed in this article.

(b) This section does not apply:

(1) To the extent the transferor in a written instrument transferring property specifically directs that the property be applied to the satisfaction of a generation-skipping transfer tax or that a generation-skipping transfer tax be prorated to the property in the manner provided in the instrument.

(2) Where federal law directs otherwise. If federal law directs the manner of proration of the federal generation-skipping transfer tax, the California generation-skipping transfer tax shall be prorated in the same manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20211.

The proration required by this article shall be made in the proportion that the value of the property received by each transferee bears to the total value of all property received by all transferees, subject to the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20212.

In making a proration required by this article:

(a) Allowances shall be made for credits, exemptions, and deductions allowed for the purpose of determining the tax payable.

(b) Interest and penalties on any deficiency shall be charged to equitably reflect the benefits and burdens of the deficiency and of any tax deductions associated with the interest and penalties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20213.

If a trust is created or other provision made whereby a transferee is given an interest in income, or an estate for years or for life, or another temporary interest in property, the tax on both the temporary interest and other interests in the property shall be charged against, and paid out of, the corpus of the property without apportionment between the temporary and other interests.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20214.

(a) If all property does not come into the possession of the trustee, the trustee is entitled, and has the duty, to recover from the transferees, the proportionate amount of the tax with which the transferees are chargeable under this chapter.

(b) If the trustee cannot collect from any transferee the amount of tax apportioned to the transferee, the amount not recoverable shall be equitably prorated among the other transferees who are subject to proration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

20215.

(a) If a person is charged with, or required to pay, a generation-skipping transfer tax greater than the amount prorated to that person because another person does not pay the amount of generation-skipping transfer tax prorated to the other person, the person charged with or required to pay the greater amount has a right of reimbursement against the other person.

(b) The right of reimbursement may be enforced through the trustee in the discretion of the trustee, or may be enforced directly by the person charged with, or required to pay, the greater amount and, for the purpose of direct enforcement, the person is subrogated to the position of the trustee.

(c) The trustee or person who has a right of reimbursement may commence a proceeding to have a court determine the right of reimbursement. The provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 20220) shall govern the proceeding, with changes necessary to make the provisions appropriate for application to the proceeding, and the court order determining the right of reimbursement is an enforceable judgment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Judicial Proceedings [20220. - 20225.]

20220.
